Utah statutes.
59-7-201.   Tax -- Minimum tax.
(1)  There is imposed upon each corporation except those exempt under Section
59-7-102 for each taxable year, a tax upon its Utah taxable income derived
from sources within this state other than income for any period which the
corporation is required to include in its tax base under Section 59-7-104.
(2)  The tax imposed by Subsection (1) shall be 5% of a corporation's Utah
taxable income.
(3)  In no case shall the tax be less than $100.
